Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
448H

ELEVATOR
MECHANICS

Section

448H-1 Definitions

448H-2 License required

448H-3 Elevator mechanics licensing board;
appointment;

organization

448H-4 Meetings

448H-5 Powers and duties of the board

448H-6 Qualifications for license

448H-7 Temporary permit

448H-8 Fees

448H-9 Injunctive relief

448H-10 Penalties

Cross References

Sunset evaluations modified, see §§26H-4 and 26H-5.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next